Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 10

Fees

45-3-1001. Organization fees.

Each application for authority to organize an association under this chapter shall be accompanied by an application fee of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), and a fee of five hundred dollars ($500) for investigation of the application, as well as any necessary travel and other expenses connected with the investigation.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.19; T.C.A., § 45-1719.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of functions under this chapter from the department of commerce and insurance to the department of financial institutions, see Executive Order No. 38 (February 11, 1983).

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

45-3-1002. Fees for establishment of branch office.

Each application for authority to establish a branch office by an association other than a satellite office shall be accompanied by an application fee of five hundred dollars ($500) and a fee of three hundred dollars ($300) for investigation of the application, as well as any necessary travel and other expenses connected with the investigation. Each application for authority to establish a satellite office shall be accompanied by an application fee of three hundred dollars ($300) and a fee of two hundred dollars ($200) for investigation of the application, as well as any necessary travel and other expenses connected with the investigation.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.20; T.C.A., § 45-1720.

45-3-1003. Other fees and expenses.

Change of Location of Office or Change of Name. The application to change the location of the home or a branch office of an association or to change the name of an association shall be accompanied by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

Amendments to Charter. Each application for approval of an amendment to the charter of any association shall be accompanied by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

Mergers and Consolidations. Each application for the merger or consolidation of two (2) or more associations shall be accompanied by a fee of three hundred dollars ($300), which fee shall be paid in equal parts by the associations proposing to merge or consolidate.

Reorganizations; Transfers of Assets; Dissolution. Each proposed plan of reorganization, proposal for the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of an association, and each proposal of liquidation and dissolution shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).

Conversion. Each application for conversion of an association subject to this chapter or of a federal association shall be accompanied by a fee of five hundred dollars ($500).

Examinations. Each association shall pay a minimum examination fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) for any examination conducted by the commissioner or the commissioner's designated representative; provided, that in the event the examination fee does not adequately cover all reasonable costs and expenses of any examination, the commissioner shall assess any association being examined all additional expenses of the examination in excess of the one hundred twenty-five dollar ($125) fee, which expenses shall include travel and other expenses and the cost to the department of the working time of its examiners or other department employees involved in the examination. The fees provided herein shall be retained by the department as expendable receipts for the division of loans.

Commissioner's Approval. In addition to all other fees required by this chapter, the commissioner is authorized, in the commissioner's discretion, to charge a fee not exceeding ten dollars ($10.00) upon each application for the commissioner's approval, submitted pursuant to any provision of this chapter.

Other Expenses. The commissioner is authorized to assess an association for all other reasonable costs and expenses, not otherwise set forth, incurred by the department in performing any acts in the course of its official duties and, in furtherance of its supervisory responsibilities, the acts that may pertain to the regulation and supervision of the association.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.21; T.C.A., § 45-1721; Acts 1981, ch. 416, § 4.

45-3-1004. Commissioner's power to modify fees.

The commissioner is authorized, in the commissioner's discretion, uniformly to prescribe fees in lower amounts than specified in this chapter, if the commissioner determines that the lower fees are adequate to cover the necessary and related expenses of the department.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.22; T.C.A., § 45-1722.